Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 71, is amended to read: Subd. 71. School bus. (a) "School bus" means a motor vehicle used to transport pupils to or from a school defined in section 120A.22, or to or from school-related activities, by the school or a school district, or by someone under an agreement with the school or a school districtnew text begin , or to provide training on the operation of the vehicle to employees of the school, school district, or a person under an agreement with the school or school districtnew text end . A school bus does not include a motor vehicle transporting children to or from school for which parents or guardians receive direct compensation from a school district, a motor coach operating under charter carrier authority, a transit bus providing services as defined in section 174.22, subdivision 7, or a vehicle otherwise qualifying as a type III vehicle under paragraph (h), when the vehicle is properly registered and insured and being driven by an employee or agent of a school district for nonscheduled or nonregular transportation. (b) A school bus may be type A, type B, type C, or type D, multifunction school activity bus, or type III as provided in paragraphs (c) to (h). (c) A "type A school bus" is a van conversion or bus constructed utilizing a cutaway front section vehicle with a left-side driver's door. This definition includes two classifications: type A-I, with a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) less than or equal to 14,500 pounds; and type A-II, with a GVWR greater than 14,500 pounds and less than or equal to 21,500 pounds. (d) A "type B school bus" is constructed utilizing a stripped chassis. The entrance door is behind the front wheels. This definition includes two classifications: type B-I, with a GVWR less than or equal to 10,000 pounds; and type B-II, with a GVWR greater than 10,000 pounds. (e) A "type C school bus" is constructed utilizing a chassis with a hood and front fender assembly. The entrance door is behind the front wheels. A "type C school bus" also includes a cutaway truck chassis or truck chassis with cab, with or without a left side door, and with a GVWR greater than 21,500 pounds. (f) A "type D school bus" is constructed utilizing a stripped chassis. The entrance door is ahead of the front wheels. (g) A "multifunction school activity bus" is a school bus that meets the definition of a multifunction school activity bus in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 571.3. A vehicle that meets the definition of a type III vehicle is not a multifunction school activity bus. (h) A "type III vehicle" is restricted to passenger vehicles and buses having a maximum manufacturer's rated seating capacity of ten or fewer people, including the driver, and a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less. A "type III vehicle" must not be outwardly equipped and identified as a type A, B, C, or D school bus or type A, B, C, or D Head Start bus. A van or bus converted to a seating capacity of ten or fewer and placed in service on or after August 1, 1999, must have been originally manufactured to comply with the passenger safety standards. (i) In this subdivision, "gross vehicle weight rating" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single vehicle. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.444, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Children getting on or off school bus. new text begin (a) new text end When a school bus is stopped on a street or highway, or other location where signs have been erected under section 169.443, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), and is displaying deleted text begin an extended stop-signal arm anddeleted text end flashing red lights, the driver of a vehicle approaching the bus deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end stop the vehicle at least 20 feet away from the bus. The vehicle driver deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not allow the vehicle to move until the school bus stop-signal arm is retracted and the red lights are no longer flashing. new text begin (b) A vehicle approaching a school bus displaying the prewarning flashing amber lights is thereby warned that continued movement is being terminated and that the flashing red lights are about to be exhibited when vehicular traffic must not encroach within 20 feet of the school bus. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.448, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Restrictions on appearance; misdemeanor. (a) A bus that is not used as a school bus must not be operated on a street or highway unless it is painted a color significantly different than national school bus glossy yellow. (b) A bus that is not used as a school bus or Head Start bus may not be operated if it is equipped with school bus or Head Start bus-related equipment and printing. (c) A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor. (d) This subdivision does not apply to a school bus owned by or under contract to a school district operated as a charter or leased bus. (e) This subdivision does not apply to a school bus operated by a licensed child care provider if: (1) the stop-signal arm is removed; (2) the lighting systems for prewarning flashing amber signals, flashing red signals, and supplemental warnings under section 169.4503, subdivision 31, are deactivated; (3) the school bus is identified as a "child care bus" in letters at least eight inches high on the front and rear top of the bus; (4) the name, address, and telephone number of the owner or operator of the bus is identified on each front door of the bus in letters not less than three inches high; and (5) the conditions under section 171.02, subdivision 2a, paragraphs (a) to (j) and (l), have been met. new text begin (f) This subdivision does not apply to a bus operated by a licensed commercial driver training school under sections 171.33 to 171.41. The bus's stop-signal arm, and lighting systems for prewarning flashing amber signals, flashing red signals, and supplemental warnings under section 169.4503, subdivision 31, must not be used on a public street or highway. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.449, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin USDOT number. new text end new text begin Any person, district, or operator providing school transportation using a school bus, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 71, must apply for a USDOT number to be used for tracking inspections conducted pursuant to section 169.451. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.454, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. deleted text begin First aid kit anddeleted text end Body fluids cleanup kit. A deleted text begin minimum of a ten-unit first aid kit, and adeleted text end body fluids cleanup kit is required. deleted text begin Theydeleted text end new text begin The kitnew text end must be contained innew text begin anew text end removable, moisture- and dust-proof deleted text begin containersdeleted text end new text begin containernew text end mounted in an accessible place within the driver's compartment and must be marked to indicate deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin the kit'snew text end identity deleted text begin and locationdeleted text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.454, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin First aid kit. new text end new text begin A first aid kit meeting the requirements as defined in the current version of the National School Transportation Specifications and Procedures (NSTSP) must be provided in vehicles model year 2027 and newer. All other vehicles may contain a minimum of a ten-unit first aid kit, as specified in Minnesota Rules 1993, part 3520.5120, or a first aid kit meeting the requirements of the NSTSP. After January 1, 2030, all type III vehicles must be equipped with a first aid kit meeting the requirements of the NSTSP. new text end